Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in  this section, “plan student” means a student enrolled in early
childhood through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is an asylum seeker, a refugee or  any other immigrant, regardless of status and as
identified by the State Board of Education by rule; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education  due to historical practices, as
identified by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and  implement a statewide education
plan for plan students.
(b) The Department of Education shall form an advisory group consisting of:
(A) Plan students;
(B) Parents or legal guardians of plan students;
(C) Educators who work with plan students; and
(D) Individuals who work with plan students and who may represent:
(i) Rural populations;
(ii) Asylum populations;
(iii) Refugee populations;
(iv) Immigrant populations;
(v) Multilingual populations;
(vi) English language learner populations;
(vii) Populations with special learning needs;
(viii) Populations who are lesbian, gay, bisexual, transgender, queer, two-spirit, intersex,
asexual, nonbinary or another minority gender identity or sexual orientation;
(ix) Community-based organizations  serving youth and families that are asylum seekers,
refugees or immigrants; and
(x) Education stakeholders, including representatives of the Department of Early Learn-
ing and Care, the Youth Development Division and the Higher Education  Coordinating Com-
mission.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 1
(c) The advisory group formed as provided  in paragraph (b) of this subsection shall advise
the Department of Education regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
(B) Eligibility criteria, applicant selection  processes and expectations for recipients of
grant awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the  State Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every  indicator of academic success,
as documented by the statewide report card and other relevant reports related to plan stu-
dents;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The educational needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary
education as determined by examining culturally responsive best practices in this state  and
across the nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(b) Increase the engagement of plan students  in educational activities before and after
regular school hours;
(c) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(d) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among plan students;
(e) Support plan student transitions to  elementary and middle school and through the
middle school and high school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(f) Support culturally  responsive pedagogy and practices from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(g) Support the development of culturally responsive curricula from  early childhood
through post-secondary education;
(h) Increase attendance of plan students in early childhood education  through post-
secondary education by creating affirming and welcoming environments;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in community colleges  and professional certif-
ication programs;
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year post-secondary institutions of edu-
cation; and
(k) Align the  plan with other statewide education plans developed and implemented by
the Department of Education.
(5) The Department of Education shall submit a  biennial report concerning the progress
of the plan developed and implemented under this section to a committee  of the Legislative
Assembly related to education at each even-numbered year regular session of the  Legislative
Assembly.
(6)(a) The Department of Education, in consultation with the advisory group, shall award
grants to Early Learning  Hubs, providers of early learning services, school districts, educa-
tion service districts, post-secondary institutions of education,  tribal governments or
community-based organizations to implement the strategies  provided in the plan developed
and implemented under this section.
(b) A grant may be awarded to any of  the entities identified in paragraph (a) of this
subsection or to collaborative partnerships among the entities.
(c) A grant may not be awarded to a community-based organization  that has a repre-
sentative on the advisory group established under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section,  an applicant must identify
and demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility criteria established  by the State
Board of Education by rule.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 329.849 is amended to read:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 2
329.849. (1) As used in this section, “plan student” means a  student enrolled in early childhood
through post-secondary education who:
(a) Is Native Hawaiian or Pacific Islander; and
(b) Has experienced disproportionate results in education due to historical practices, as  identi-
fied by the State Board of Education by rule.
(2)(a) The Department of Education shall develop and implement a statewide education  plan for
plan students.
(b) The Department of Education shall form an advisory group consisting of individuals who:
(A) Have lived experiences with, or a demonstrated  understanding of, issues facing Native
Hawaiian or Pacific  Islander communities, including students who have those experiences or
understandings;
(B) Represent community-based organizations serving Native Hawaiian or Pacific Islander  youth
and families; and
(C) Represent education stakeholders, including representatives of the Department  of Early
Learning and Care,  the Youth Development Division and the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
mission.
(c) The advisory group formed as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection shall advise the
Department of Education regarding:
(A) Development and implementation of the plan;
(B) Eligibility criteria, applicant selection  processes and expectations for recipients of grant
awards described in this section; and
(C) Adoption of rules by the State Board of Education for the implementation of the plan.
(3) The plan developed under this section must address:
(a) The disparities experienced by plan students in every  indicator of academic success, as
documented by the statewide report card and other relevant reports related to plan students;
(b) The historical practices leading to disproportionate outcomes for plan students; and
(c) The  educational needs of plan students from early childhood through post-secondary educa-
tion as determined by examining culturally appropriate  best practices in this state and across the
nation.
(4) The plan developed and implemented under this section must provide strategies to:
(a) Address the disproportionate rate of disciplinary  incidents involving plan students compared
to all students in the education system;
(b) Increase parental engagement in the education of plan students;
(c) Increase the engagement  of plan students in educational activities before and after regular
school  hours;
(d) Increase early childhood education and kindergarten readiness for plan students;
(e) Improve literacy and numeracy levels among plan  students between kindergarten and grade
three;
(f) Support plan student transitions to middle school and through the middle  school and high
school grades to maintain and improve academic performance;
(g) Support culturally responsive pedagogy and  practices from early childhood through post-
secondary education;
(h) Support the development of culturally  responsive curricula from early childhood through
post-secondary education;
(i) Increase attendance of plan students in community  colleges and professional certification
programs;
(j) Increase attendance of plan students in four-year  post-secondary institutions of education;
and
(k) Align the  plan with statewide education plans developed and implemented [ under ORS
329.841, 329.843, 329.845 and 329.847] by the Department of Education .
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 3
(5) The Department of Education shall submit a biennial report concerning the  progress of the
plan developed and implemented under this section to a committee of the Legislative Assembly  re-
lated to education at each even-numbered year regular session of the Legislative Assembly.
(6) The Department of Education, in consultation with the advisory group, shall award  grants
to Early Learning Hubs, providers  of early learning services, school districts, education service
districts, post-secondary institutions  of education, tribal governments, community-based organiza-
tions or a consortium of these entities to  implement the strategies provided in the plan developed
and implemented under this section.
(7) To qualify for and receive a grant described in this section, an applicant must identify  and
demonstrate that the applicant meets the eligibility  criteria established by the State Board of Edu-
cation by rule.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 14, chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium ending
June 30, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses by the Department of Educa-
tion from the  Statewide Education Initiatives Account established under ORS 327.250 for
operations, is increased by $243,802 for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of  section
1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 13 (3), chapter 449, Oregon Laws 2023, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2025, as the maximum  limit for payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services by the Department of Education  from the Statewide Education Initiatives
Account established under ORS  327.250 for all other grants, is increased by $2,000,000 for the
purpose of carrying out the provisions of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
Passed by Senate March 4, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1532 (SB 1532-A) Page 4